Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1315
Service award benefit program; annual account.

Each city, village, or rural or suburban fire protection district conducting a service award benefit program shall establish an annual account for each year of service in which such program is being conducted. All funds from whatever source furnished for the purpose of providing service award benefits to active emergency responders, active rescue squad members, and active volunteer firefighters participating in the service award benefit program during a year of service shall be placed into the annual account for that year of service.

Laws 1999, LB 849, § 15.